California statutes. Penal Code
(1) “In-person visit” means an on-site visit that may include barriers. In-person visits include interactions in which an inmate has physical contact with a visitor, the inmate is able to see a visitor through a barrier, or the inmate is otherwise in a room with a visitor without physical contact. “In-person visit” does not include an interaction between an inmate and a visitor through the use of an on-site, two-way, audio-video terminal.

(2) “Video visitation” means interaction between an inmate and a member of the public through the means of an
 audio-visual communication device when the member of the public is located at a local detention facility or at a remote location.

(3) “Local detention facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 6031.4.

(b) A local detention facility that offered in-person visitation as of January 1, 2017, may not convert to video visitation only.

(c) A local detention facility shall not charge for visitation when visitors are onsite and participating in either in-person or video visitation. For purposes of this subdivision, “onsite” is defined as at the location where the inmate is housed.

(d) If a local detention facility offered video visitation only as of January
 1, 2017, on-site video visitation shall be offered free of charge, and the first hour of remote video visitation per week shall be offered free of charge if the facility offers remote video visitation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 363, Sec. 8.   (SB 112)   Effective September 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.5.

(a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as Wakiesha’s Law.

(b) If an incarcerated person has died, the county or city jail shall notify all people covered by the current medical release of information form and the next of kin form within 24 hours.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   (AB 1269)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4033.

(a) (1) The San Diego County Sheriff’s Department and the Department of Motor Vehicles may implement a pilot program to provide an identification card for eligible incarcerated persons, as defined under subdivision (b), so they may have a valid identification card pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of Chapter 1 of Division 6 of the Vehicle Code, to the extent administratively feasible and within available resources, when released from a San Diego County detention facility. The pilot program may also include the issuance of renewed driver’s licenses pursuant to subdivision (d). The pilot program shall be five years long.

(2) To the
 extent administratively feasible and within available resources, the San Diego County Sheriff’s Department shall facilitate the process between the incarcerated person and the agencies holding documentation required for an eligible incarcerated person, as defined under subdivision (b), to obtain a California identification card, such as a birth certificate or social security number, including, but not limited to, the provision of any necessary notary services, assistance with obtaining necessary forms, and correspondence.

(b) For purposes of this section, “eligible incarcerated person” means an incarcerated person who is applying for an original or replacement identification card and meets the following requirements in paragraph (1) or (2):

(1) (A) The incarcerated person has previously held a California driver’s license or identification card.

(B) (i) The incarcerated person has a usable photo on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(ii) If the photo is deemed unusable, the incarcerated person shall have a new photo taken.

(C) The incarcerated person has provided, and the
 Department of Motor Vehicles has verified, all of the following information:

(i) The incarcerated person’s true full name.

(ii) The incarcerated person’s date of birth.

(iii) The incarcerated person’s social security number.

(iv) The incarcerated person’s legal presence in the United States or, upon implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code, if the incarcerated person is unable to submit satisfactory proof that their presence in the United States is authorized under federal law, the incarcerated person has provided proof of their identity pursuant to Section 12801.9 of the Vehicle Code.

(v) California residency.

(2) (A) The incarcerated person has not previously held a California driver’s license or identification card.

(B) The incarcerated person has signed and verified their application for an identification card under the penalty of perjury.

(C) The incarcerated person has a usable photo taken.

(D) The incarcerated person has provided a legible print of their thumb or finger.

(E) The incarcerated person has provided acceptable proof of the information described under clauses (i) to (v), inclusive, of subparagraph
 (C) of paragraph (1), and that information is subject to verification by the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(c) The fee for an original or replacement identification card issued to an eligible incarcerated person pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the fee set forth under subdivision (h) of Section 14902 of the Vehicle Code.

(d) (1) The San Diego County Sheriff’s Department and
 Department of Motor Vehicles may provide a renewed driver’s license in lieu of an identification card if the incarcerated person meets the eligibility criteria specified in Section 12814.5 of the Vehicle Code and is otherwise eligible for the issuance of a driver’s license. An incarcerated person receiving a driver’s license shall be responsible for paying the difference between the cost of the driver’s license and the reduced fee for a California identification card.

(2) This subdivision shall apply to an incarcerated person whose driving privilege was valid within the prior 10 years.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as removing the examination discretion of the Department of Motor Vehicles under Section 12814 of the Vehicle Code.

(e) (1) No later than April 1, 2028, the San Diego County Sheriff’s Department, if it implements the pilot program, shall submit a report to the Legislature with all of the following information:

(A) The number of identification cards issued.

(B) The number of driver’s licenses renewed.

(C) Any problems or barriers in implementing the pilot program.

(D) Any recommendations or best practices identified.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 472, Sec. 1.   (AB 1329)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Joint County Jails [4050. - 4067.]

4050.

This chapter may be cited as the Joint County Jail Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

Any two or more counties may form a district for the purpose of establishing and operating a joint county jail to serve such counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

Any district organized under this chapter shall have and exercise the powers expressly granted in this chapter, together with such other powers as are reasonably implied therefrom and necessary and proper to carry out the objects and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

The board of supervisors of any county may initiate proceedings proposing the creation of a joint district for the purpose of maintaining a joint county jail under the provisions of this chapter to be composed of two or more counties by the adoption of a resolution reciting the following:

(1) That it will be beneficial to the public interest to create a joint district for the establishment or operation, or both, of a joint county jail to which persons from any of the counties proposed to be included in the proposed district may be committed.

(2) The names of the counties proposed to be included in the proposed district which will be benefited by the formation thereof.

(3) That it is proposed to create a joint district for the establishment or operation, or both, of a joint county jail under the provisions of this chapter for the counties so named.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4054.

When adopted, certified copies of the resolution provided for in Section 4053, shall be transmitted to the several clerks of the boards of supervisors in each of the counties named in the resolution other than that in which the proceedings are initiated.

Upon the adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 4053, the board of supervisors of the county adopting the same shall name and appoint two members of the board to represent the county upon the board of directors of the joint district proposed to be organized.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4055.

Upon receipt of the resolution adopted under Section 4053, the boards of supervisors of the counties affected and to whom the same may be directed shall consider the advisability of creating and organizing a joint district as proposed in said resolution and, upon determining the facts involved therein, shall severally adopt resolutions either rejecting or approving the proposal to create such joint district. Each resolution of approval shall, in addition to the matters otherwise required therein, also name and appoint the members of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the resolution qualified to represent such county upon the board of directors of the proposed joint district. A certified copy of the resolution of approval shall be forthwith transmitted to the clerk of the board of supervisors initiating the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4056.

The board of supervisors of any county initiating proceedings for the creation of a joint district under this chapter shall, after the receipt of a copy of the resolution approving the proposal to form such district as provided in Section 4055 from the board of supervisors of each county proposed to be included within any such joint district, adopt a resolution declaring the creation and organization of said joint district and setting forth the names of the counties composing said district. A certified copy of the resolution shall be transmitted to and filed with the Secretary of State, whereupon the joint district shall be deemed created and organized and shall exercise all the powers granted in this chapter and shall bear the name and designation of “Joint County Jail District No. _____ of the State of California.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4057.

All districts organized under this chapter shall be numbered in the order of their creation, the number to be assigned to said district forthwith upon the organization thereof by the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall keep and maintain in his office a list and register showing the joint county jail districts organized under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4058.

The Secretary of State shall furnish and transmit to the clerk of the board of supervisors of the county adopting the initial resolution for the organization of any district under this chapter a certificate of the organization of the same. Upon receipt of the certificate the clerk shall within 10 days send a certified copy of the certificate to each of the clerks of the several boards of supervisors of the counties constituting the district, and shall also within the time specified in this section notify each supervisor appointed as a member of the board of directors of the district of such fact and of the time and place of the first meeting of the board of directors of the district. The time and place of the meeting shall be fixed and determined by the clerk of the board adopting the initial resolution, but said time of meeting shall be within 30 days after the date of mailing notices thereof. The necessary expense incurred by supervisors in attending and in going to and coming from any meeting of the board of directors of the district shall constitute a county charge of their respective counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4059.

The body formed under Section 4058 shall be called the board of directors of such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4060.

The members of the board of directors may enter into an agreement for and on behalf of the counties appointing them binding said counties to the joint enterprise provided for in this chapter and apportioning the cost of establishing and maintaining a joint county jail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4061.

All sums found due from any county according to the provisions of this chapter are a charge against said county, and may be collected in the manner provided by law by the board of directors of a district formed under this chapter, or, in its behalf by the board of supervisors of any county in the district by an action instituted and tried in any county in the district in which the same may be filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4062.

The board of directors may establish the joint county jail provided for in this chapter and shall provide for the feeding, care, and treatment of prisoners therein, and must conform to such standards for construction, feeding, clothing, bedding and programming as are imposed pursuant to law on county jails.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4063.

Each county in a district formed under this chapter shall pay from its general fund its proportionate share to the board of directors of such amount as the board may designate to constitute a cash revolving fund to carry on the work and expense of maintaining such joint county jail. Each month a statement of the expense of the joint county jail shall be sent to the board of supervisors of each county in the district, together with a claim for its proportionate share of expenses. Amounts when received shall be paid into the cash revolving fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4064.

Convicted persons may be committed to a joint county jail from a county comprising the district the same as if the commitment were to a jail maintained by that county alone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4065.

The provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing at Section 4000) of this title shall, so far as appropriate, be applicable to a joint county jail established pursuant to this chapter, and the person appointed by the board of directors to superintend a joint county jail has such powers and duties as has a sheriff, with respect to county jails, under Chapter 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4066.

The board of directors may make rules and regulations for the government of a joint county jail not inconsistent with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------

4067.

A joint county jail district formed under this chapter may be dissolved in the following manner:

(a) The board or boards of supervisors of a county or counties containing more than fifty percent (50%) of the population of the entire district shall by a unanimous vote adopt a resolution stating that the existence of a joint county jail is no longer desirable for the public welfare and announcing the intention to withdraw therefrom and to dissolve said district.

(b) The resolution or resolutions so adopted shall be communicated to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of all the counties comprising the district and also to the Secretary of State.

(c) If it appears that the resolution was unanimously adopted by the board or boards of supervisors in the counties desiring to withdraw, and that such county or counties contain more than fifty percent (50%) of the entire population in the district, the Secretary of State shall thereupon certify to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing the district that the district is dissolved.

(d) Thereupon the board of directors of the district shall within 90 days:

(1) Abolish the joint county jail;

(2) Return all prisoners therein to the custody of the sheriffs of their respective counties;

(3) Dispose of all equipment belonging to said joint county jail and the district;

(4) Render an accounting to the clerks of the boards of supervisors of the counties composing such district of all sums of money received and paid out since their last previous accounting, including the balance of revolving fund on hand at said last previous accounting;

(5) Apportion and repay to said counties all sums of money then remaining in their hands, and they shall thereupon be relieved of further responsibility in said matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. County Industrial Farms and Road Camps [4100. - 4305.]



  ARTICLE 1. County Industrial Farms [4100. - 4137.]

4100.

It is the purpose of this article to make possible the substitution of constructive labor for profitless prison confinement in order that those who are charged with or convicted of public offenses and deprived of their liberty may become better citizens because of their disciplinary experience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4101.

In each county an industrial farm or industrial road camp may be established under the provisions of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

Before establishing an industrial farm or industrial road camp in any county the board of supervisors thereof shall adopt a resolution of its intention so to do. The resolution shall state an amount per person per day for which persons from incorporated cities will be maintained on an industrial farm. Certified copies of the resolution shall be forwarded by the clerk of the board of supervisors to the clerks of all incorporated cities within the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1979.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

Upon receipt of the resolution as provided in Section 4102, the legislative body of any incorporated city wishing to avail itself of the use of a proposed industrial farm shall adopt a resolution setting forth the following matters:

1. The number of persons sentenced to imprisonment in the jail of such city during the fiscal year last preceding the adoption of the resolution of intention by the board of supervisors;

2. The total number of days for which all such persons were imprisoned in the jail of the city during such fiscal year;

3. A declaration of the desire of the city adopting the resolution to have the prisoners of the city cared for by the county on the industrial farm or industrial road camp and of the agreement of the city to pay the county quarterly for the care of the prisoners of the city at the rate set forth in the resolution of intention.

A certified copy of the resolution provided for in this section shall be forwarded to the clerk of the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4104.

Any board of supervisors having adopted a resolution of intention to establish an industrial farm or industrial road camp shall ascertain and enter in its minutes the following facts:

(a) The number of persons sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail during the fiscal year last preceding the adoption of the resolution of intention.

(b) The total number of days for which all persons were imprisoned in the county jail during that fiscal year.

(c) The number of persons sentenced from the superior court of the county to any state prison upon conviction of a violation of Section 270 or Section 270a during that fiscal year.

(d) The total number of days for which all persons so sentenced to state prisons were therein imprisoned during that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 135.)
-------------------------------------------

4105.

Upon ascertaining the facts provided for in Sections 4102 to 4104, inclusive, the board of supervisors may proceed to establish an industrial farm or industrial road camp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4106.

For the purpose of establishing an industrial farm the board of supervisors may acquire by condemnation, purchase, lease or donation as many acres of land suitable for agriculture as may be necessary for the purposes of the farm. Such land may be situate within or without the county and may consist of separate parcels. If the land is without the county no industrial farm may be established thereon without the consent of the board of supervisors of the county in which the land is located. The board of supervisors shall erect on such land such buildings and structures and make such improvements and institute such industries as are necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4107.

The board of supervisors shall secure by purchase or otherwise personal property convenient or necessary to carry out the purposes of this article. Stock, machinery, or any other property belonging to the county and in use on the county farm or elsewhere may be used on an industrial farm.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4108.

The board of supervisors shall employ a superintendent of an industrial farm or camp and such other subordinate persons as may be necessary for the proper administration thereof and the keeping of the prisoners imprisoned thereon. As part of the compensation to be agreed upon for such superintendent and other persons board and lodging may be furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4109.

The board shall also adopt rules governing the administration of a farm or camp formed under the provisions of this article and discipline thereon in furtherance of the purposes of this article, which rules shall be enforced by the superintendent and those subordinate to him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4110.

If women are to be sentenced to an industrial farm, the board of supervisors establishing it shall provide thereon separate quarters for women prisoners, or may establish a separate industrial farm for women prisoners. Nothing in the section shall be construed to impose any requirement upon a county to confine male and female prisoners in the same or an adjoining facility or impose any duty upon a county to establish or maintain programs which involve the joint participation of male and female prisoners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 592.)
-------------------------------------------

4111.

If a separate farm for women prisoners is established it shall be considered as a part of the industrial farm of the county within the meaning of all provisions of this article, except that none but women prisoners shall be admitted to it. A woman assistant to the superintendent of an industrial farm shall be in immediate charge of any farm established for women prisoners only.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4112.

When land has been acquired and such buildings and structures erected and improvements made as may be immediately necessary for the carrying out of the purposes of this article or arrangements have been made for an industrial road camp or camps, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution proclaiming that an industrial farm or road camp has been established in the county and designating a day on and after which persons will be admitted to such farm or camp. Certified copies of the resolution shall be forwarded by the clerk of the board of supervisors to each superior court judge in the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 568.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

4114.

Each county which establishes an industrial farm or camp shall provide a county classification committee, which shall function as follows:

(1) The sheriff shall appoint the members of this committee, which may include members of his staff and qualified citizens of the county. If there is a county jail physician, he shall be an ex officio member of this committee. All committee members shall serve without remuneration.

(2) The committee shall meet at least once weekly for the purpose of assigning each person who has been sentenced to the county jail to the proper degree of custody and treatment within one of the available adult detention facilities operated by the county. Any person assigned to medical treatment may decline such treatment and provide other care or treatment for himself at his own expense.

(3) Each county prisoner serving a jail sentence of over 30 days shall appear before the committee during the first third of his sentence.

(4) City prisoners who have been recommended to the committee by the chief of police may be transferred to the county industrial farm or camp at the option of the committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.

The county jail shall serve as the initial place of detention for all adult persons committed to the custody of the sheriff, except city prisoners who are transferred to a farm or camp by the county classification committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.5.

(a) The board of supervisors of a county where adequate facilities are not available for prisoners who would otherwise be confined in its county adult detention facilities may enter into an agreement with the board or boards of supervisors of one or more nearby counties whose county adult detention facilities are adequate and are readily accessible from the first county to permit commitment of misdemeanants, and any persons required to serve a term of imprisonment in county adult detention facilities as a condition of probation, to a jail in a county having adequate facilities that is a party to the agreement. That agreement shall make provision for the support of a person so committed or transferred by the county from which he or she is committed. When that agreement is in effect, commitments may be made by the court and
 support of a person so committed shall be a charge upon the county from which he or she is committed.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 44, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2018, Ch. 36, Sec. 22.   (AB 1812)   Effective June 27, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2021, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.55.

(a) Upon agreement with the sheriff or director of the county department of corrections, a board of supervisors may enter into a contract with other public agencies to provide housing for inmates sentenced to a county jail in community correctional facilities created pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 2910) of Chapter 7 of Title 1 or Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 6250) of Title 7.

(b) Facilities operated pursuant to agreements entered into under subdivision (a) shall comply with the minimum standards for local detention facilities as provided by Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 3000) of Division 3 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 161.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

4115.56.

(a) Upon agreement with the sheriff or director of the county department of corrections, a board of supervisors may enter into a contract with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to house inmates who are within 60 days or less of release from the state prison to a county jail facility for the purpose of reentry and community transition purposes.

(b) When housed in county facilities, inmates shall be under the legal custody and jurisdiction of local county facilities and not under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 12, Sec. 37.   (AB 17 1x)   Effective September 21, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 46 of Ch. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

4116.

No person shall be committed directly by any court to a county industrial farm or camp except as provided in the Welfare and Institutions Code. All other commitments shall be made to the sheriff for placement in such county adult detention facility as the county classification committee may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4117.

No person shall be transferred to an industrial farm or camp unless he has appeared before the county classification committee and has been assigned to that facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4118.

The legislative body of any incorporated city located in a county which has established an industrial farm or industrial road camp may adopt and forward to the board of supervisors a certified copy of a resolution stating that the city desires to have its prisoners cared for on the industrial farm or camp and agrees to pay therefor quarterly at a rate per prisoner per day, which rate shall be set forth in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4119.

At its option the board of supervisors may adopt a resolution stating that the county will care for the prisoners of the city on its industrial farm or camp at the rate set forth in the city’s resolution specified in Section 4118. A certified copy of the resolution provided for in this section shall be forwarded to the clerk of the city named therein, who shall immediately notify the chief of police of the city.

Thereafter, the chief of police of the city, or his representative, shall meet regularly with the county classification committee for the purpose of determining the eligibility of certain city prisoners for transfer to a county industrial farm or camp. The committee shall consider for transfer only those city prisoners who have been selected and recommended for transfer by the chief of police. In each case, the committee may transfer or reject such prisoners as it sees fit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4120.

Upon the expiration of the sentence of any person imprisoned in any industrial farm or camp, he shall be discharged, and either furnished with transportation to the place where he was convicted or given a sum of money sufficient to pay his fare to such place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4121.

The cost of establishing and maintaining an industrial farm or industrial road camp formed under this article shall be paid out of the county general fund. Any revenue derived from such farm or camp, including that received from any city for the care of its prisoners on said farm, shall be paid into the county general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4122.

The cost of transporting city prisoners to an industrial farm or camp shall be borne by the city from whose courts they were committed. All other transportation charges shall be borne by the county and paid out of the general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4123.

Any person transferred from an industrial farm or camp to the county jail shall be maintained at the jail at the expense of the county as are other prisoners in such jail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4124.

Each county board of supervisors may specify a rate to be charged for the care of city prisoners, which rate shall not exceed the average cost to the county of caring for one prisoner per day. In calculating this average cost, the value of the farm products used in other county institutions and in supplying the needs of paupers, incompetents, poor and indigent persons and persons incapacitated by age, disease or accident shall be deducted from the cost of maintenance, and the cost of the original investment in establishing an industrial farm shall not be included. The reasonable value of services rendered by city prisoners to the extent that such services inure to the benefit of the county shall be deducted from the average cost of caring for city prisoners. Cities may, under terms and conditions suitable to the board of supervisors, be assigned prisoners for the purposes authorized by Section 36904 of the Government Code. By mutual agreement between cities and the county, the rate may be changed from time to time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1979.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.

Each person in custody on any industrial farm or industrial road camp who is found to have any person or persons dependent on him for support, as provided in Section 4127, shall be credited with a sum not to exceed two dollars ($2) for each day of eight hours work done by him on such farm or camp. Every other person in custody on an industrial farm or camp shall be credited with a sum not to exceed one dollar ($1) for each day of eight hours work done by him on such farm or camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 495.)
-------------------------------------------

4125.1.

The board of supervisors may contract with the United States or the State of California, or any department or agency thereof, for the performance of work and labor by any person in custody on any county industrial farm or industrial road camp or confined in the county jail or branch thereof under a final judgment of imprisonment rendered in a criminal action or proceeding or as a condition of probation in the suppression of fires within and upon the national forests, state parks, or other lands of the United States or the State of California, or within and upon such other lands, of whatever ownership, contiguous to, or adjacent to said state or federal lands, the suppression of fires upon which other lands affords fire protection to said state or federal lands. Such payments as may be so contracted for and to be paid by the United States or by the State of California for the work and labor so performed by any person so in custody may, by order of the board of supervisors, be credited in full or in part, and upon such terms and conditions as the board shall determine, to any such person so in custody and performing such work and labor, and all in addition to those credits hereinbefore provided in Section 4125 of this code.

Whenever any such person so in custody shall perform the services herein specified he shall be subject to workmen’s compensation benefits to the same extent as a county employee, and the board of supervisors shall provide and cover any such person so in custody, while performing such services, with accident, death and compensation insurance as is otherwise regularly provided for employees of the county.

The term “suppression of fires” as herein used shall include the construction of firebreaks and other works of improvement for the prevention and suppression of fire whether or not constructed in the actual course of suppression of existing fires.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1660.)
-------------------------------------------

4126.

The maximum amount per day to be credited to a person in custody on an industrial farm or camp shall be fixed from time to time by the board of supervisors and shall be as large as is justified by the production on the farm or camp but shall not exceed the sums mentioned in this article.

The superintendent of an industrial farm may by order cause an amount less than the maximum per day to be credited to any person because of lack of effort on the part of the person, the amount credited to be in proportion to the effort. 

The sum to the credit of each person employed upon an industrial farm upon his discharge shall be paid him in addition to any transportation charge otherwise paid under this article. Any person may, by written order, direct the payment of any sums credited to him under this article to any person dependent upon him or to whom he is indebted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4127.

The court by whom any person was sentenced may at any time by written order direct payment of all or any part of the sums to be credited to any such person under this article to any person or persons dependent for support on the prisoner. At the time of sentencing the court shall by making inquiry or taking evidence find whether or not any person or persons are dependent upon the defendant for support. A copy of the finding of the court shall be transmitted to the county classification committee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4128.

Payments authorized under this article to be made to any person other than the prisoner may be made weekly on any day designated by the superintendent of the farm or camp.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4129.

For the purpose of making the payments designated in this article the board of supervisors shall by order provide the superintendent with a revolving fund. Upon order of the board of supervisors the county auditor shall draw a warrant in favor of the superintendent of an industrial farm or camp and the county treasurer shall cash it. Thereafter the superintendent shall receive from the county general fund upon demands supported by receipts all sums paid out by him under the provisions of this section and shall return all sums so received to the revolving fund.

The provisions of Section 29323 of the Government Code are applicable to a revolving fund established pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

4130.

So far as practicable those in custody on an industrial farm shall be employed in productive labor. The products of an industrial farm shall be used: first, to maintain the prisoners and employees on such farm; second, to supply other county institutions having need of the same with the farm’s products; third, to supply the needs of paupers, incompetents, poor and indigent persons and those incapacitated by age, disease or accident with whose relief and support the county is charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

4131.
